Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REGIONAL YOUTH HOUSING, WORKFORCE, AND COMMUNITY SERVICES HUB.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Youthprise to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip property located at 340 Cedar Street in the city of St. Paul to provide space for a housing cooperative, nonprofit organization programming and administration, workforce development and community wellness services, community gathering, and other resources to serve communities around the state. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end